test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_vuaggu_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:
  Noun - huáppu: # ok  
    huáppu+N+Sg+Nom:  huápˊpu
    huáppu+N+Sg+Gen:  huápu
    huáppu+N+Sg+Acc:  huápu
    huáppu+N+Sg+Ill:  huápun
    huáppu+N+Sg+Loc:  huápust
    huáppu+N+Sg+Com:  huápˊpoin
    huáppu+N+Sg+Abe:  huáˊputtáá
    huáppu+N+Ess:  huápˊpun
    huáppu+N+Par:  huápˊpud
    huáppu+N+Pl+Nom:  huápuh
    huáppu+N+Pl+Gen:  [huápui, huáˊpui]
    huáppu+N+Pl+Acc:  huápuid
    huáppu+N+Pl+Ill:  huápˊpoid
    huáppu+N+Pl+Loc:  huápuin
    huáppu+N+Pl+Com:  huáˊpuiguin
    huáppu+N+Pl+Abe:  huáˊpuittáá

  Noun - skuáppu: # ok  
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Nom:  skuápˊpu
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Gen:  skuápu
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Acc:  skuápu
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Ill:  skuápun
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Loc:  skuápust
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Com:  skuápˊpoin
    skuáppu+N+Sg+Abe:  skuáˊputtáá
    skuáppu+N+Ess:  skuápˊpun
    skuáppu+N+Par:  skuápˊpud
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Nom:  skuápuh
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Gen:  [skuápui, skuáˊpui]
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Acc:  skuápuid
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Ill:  skuápˊpoid
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Loc:  skuápuin
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Com:  skuáˊpuiguin
    skuáppu+N+Pl+Abe:  skuáˊpuittáá

  Noun - tuáttu: # ok LAAVU
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Nom:  tuátˊtu
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Gen:  tuátu
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Acc:  tuátu
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Ill:  tuátun
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Loc:  tuátust
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Com:  tuátˊtoin
    tuáttu+N+Sg+Abe:  tuáˊtuttáá
    tuáttu+N+Ess:  tuátˊtun
    tuáttu+N+Par:  tuátˊtud
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Nom:  tuátuh
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Gen:  [tuátui, tuáˊtui]
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Acc:  tuátuid
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Ill:  tuátˊtoid
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Loc:  tuátuin
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Com:  tuáˊtuiguin
    tuáttu+N+Pl+Abe:  tuáˊtuittáá

  Noun - vuággu: # ok VUAGGU
    vuággu+N+Sg+Nom:  vuágˊgu
    vuággu+N+Sg+Gen:  vuágu
    vuággu+N+Sg+Acc:  vuágu
    vuággu+N+Sg+Ill:  vuágun
    vuággu+N+Sg+Loc:  vuágust
    vuággu+N+Sg+Com:  vuágˊgoin
    vuággu+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊguttáá
    vuággu+N+Ess:  vuágˊgun
    vuággu+N+Par:  vuágˊgud
    vuággu+N+Pl+Nom:  vuáguh
    vuággu+N+Pl+Gen: [vuágui, vuáˊgui]
    vuággu+N+Pl+Acc:  vuáguid
    vuággu+N+Pl+Ill:  vuágˊgoid
    vuággu+N+Pl+Loc:  vuáguin
    vuággu+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊguiguin
    vuággu+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊguittáá
